Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-141
Sidewalks and substructures; regulation.

A city of the second class shall have the power to regulate the use of sidewalks and all structures thereunder.

Laws 1881, c. 24, § 1, p. 197;

R.S.1913, § 5035;

C.S.1922, § 4204;

C.S.1929, § 17-143;

R.S.1943, § 17-141;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 33.

City is bound to keep its sidewalks reasonably safe for travel, and it is the duty of the officers of the city to exercise reasonable diligence in knowing of dangerous conditions thereof. Anderson v. City of Albion, 64 Neb. 280, 89 N.W. 794 (1902).

Streets must be kept in a reasonably safe condition for public travel, and a petition sufficiently charges negligence if it alleges facts from which a person may reasonably infer street was not kept in such condition. City of Aurora v. Cox, 43 Neb. 727, 62 N.W. 66 (1895).